lrec2010_examples/lexnoun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +mas +fem +sg +pl ^GN1 ^GN2 ^GN3 ^GN4
!Nouns ending in o
LEXICON Noun1
+N+mas:0   Npl;

!Nouns ending in a
LEXICON Noun2
+N+fem:0   Npl;


!Nouns ending in ción
LEXICON Noun3
+N+fem:0 Npl;

!Nouns ending every other way
Lexicon Noun4
+N:0 Npl;

!Nouns ending in ma,pa,ta should be put in a seperate lexicon

LEXICON Npl
+sg:0 #;
+pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Root
abuso  Noun1;
acueducto  Noun1;
adulterio  Noun1;
agravio  Noun1;
alberto  Noun1;
alimento  Noun1;
amalio  Noun1;
anatómico  Noun1;
antibiótico  Noun1;
apático  Noun1;
arado  Noun1;
armadillo  Noun1;
arrimo  Noun1;
asfalto  Noun1;
aterido  Noun1;
autillo  Noun1;
baco  Noun1;
banquillo  Noun1;
basurero  Noun1;
berilo  Noun1;
bismuto  Noun1;
bólido  Noun1;
brazo  Noun1;
caballerizo  Noun1;
cálamo  Noun1;
camionero  Noun1;
cantero  Noun1;
cardenalato  Noun1;
casamiento  Noun1;
catarro  Noun1;
celso  Noun1;
cerrojo  Noun1;
cipriano  Noun1;
clodomiro  Noun1;
colmenero  Noun1;
complemento  Noun1;
congrio  Noun1;
contemporáneo  Noun1;
cornelio  Noun1;
crepúsculo  Noun1;
cuadro  Noun1;
cultismo  Noun1;
charrasco  Noun1;
chismoso  Noun1;
danilo  Noun1;
demócrito  Noun1;
desatino  Noun1;
desenfreno  Noun1;
despojo  Noun1;
diálogo  Noun1;
dirigismo  Noun1;
dominicano  Noun1;
ecuatoriano  Noun1;
electorado  Noun1;
emigrado  Noun1;
encomio  Noun1;
entarimado  Noun1;
epifanio  Noun1;
escandinavo  Noun1;
esfuerzo  Noun1;
establecimiento  Noun1;
estornino  Noun1;
eustacio  Noun1;
explosivo  Noun1;
fardo  Noun1;
ferroviario  Noun1;
fláccido  Noun1;
formulario  Noun1;
fresno  Noun1;
galápago  Noun1;
garrapato  Noun1;
gerundio  Noun1;
gotardo  Noun1;
grifo  Noun1;
guijarro  Noun1;
hato  Noun1;
hermetismo  Noun1;
hipismo  Noun1;
honorio  Noun1;
ibérico  Noun1;
impulso  Noun1;
infundio  Noun1;
internado  Noun1;
jacobo  Noun1;
juvencio  Noun1;
landolfo  Noun1;
lechero  Noun1;
liberalismo  Noun1;
lirismo  Noun1;
ludovico  Noun1;
magistrado  Noun1;
mamotreto  Noun1;
maquinismo  Noun1;
materialismo  Noun1;
mediterráneo  Noun1;
mercurio  Noun1;
milésimo  Noun1;
modernismo  Noun1;
monumento  Noun1;
múltiplo  Noun1;
navarro  Noun1;
nicaragüeño  Noun1;
noticiero  Noun1;
obrero  Noun1;
olimpo  Noun1;
organismo  Noun1;
oxígeno  Noun1;
palomo  Noun1;
parámetro  Noun1;
pasamanero  Noun1;
pebetero  Noun1;
pensamiento  Noun1;
pescadero  Noun1;
pinchazo  Noun1;
plato  Noun1;
polidoro  Noun1;
portento  Noun1;
prendimiento  Noun1;
principio  Noun1;
propio  Noun1;
puerto  Noun1;
quincuagésimo  Noun1;
rancio  Noun1;
rebozo  Noun1;
refinamiento  Noun1;
religioso  Noun1;
reposo  Noun1;
retoño  Noun1;
ritualismo  Noun1;
roñoso  Noun1;
sabelotodo  Noun1;
sandro  Noun1;
segundo  Noun1;
serrucho  Noun1;
silvio  Noun1;
socialismo  Noun1;
sotero  Noun1;
sufrimiento  Noun1;
tabardo  Noun1;
tapujo  Noun1;
telemando  Noun1;
tercio  Noun1;
tiesto  Noun1;
toldo  Noun1;
toxicómano  Noun1;
trato  Noun1;
ultramontanismo  Noun1;
velero  Noun1;
vino  Noun1;
yodo  Noun1;
aceña  Noun2;
adelma  Noun2;
afluencia  Noun2;
agustina  Noun2;
alcaldía  Noun2;
alfonsina  Noun2;
altea  Noun2;
américa  Noun2;
andaluza  Noun2;
anticuaria  Noun2;
apología  Noun2;
argelina  Noun2;
arrastrada  Noun2;
asfixia  Noun2;
atalaya  Noun2;
autóctona  Noun2;
avutarda  Noun2;
baladronada  Noun2;
baqueta  Noun2;
basílica  Noun2;
begonia  Noun2;
bernardita  Noun2;
birmana  Noun2;
bogotana  Noun2;
botella  Noun2;
brocha  Noun2;
burócrata  Noun2;
cacería  Noun2;
calcomanía  Noun2;
camelista  Noun2;
cándida  Noun2;
captura  Noun2;
carla  Noun2;
cartilla  Noun2;
catalanista  Noun2;
ceca  Noun2;
centroamericana  Noun2;
ciénaga  Noun2;
cisma  Noun2;
clueca  Noun2;
colada  Noun2;
comisaría  Noun2;
condena  Noun2;
consciencia  Noun2;
controladora  Noun2;
córnea  Noun2;
costanilla  Noun2;
croata  Noun2;
cuentista  Noun2;
chacha  Noun2;
charrasca  Noun2;
chingadura  Noun2;
chulería  Noun2;
datilera  Noun2;
demanda  Noun2;
descontenta  Noun2;
detractora  Noun2;
directora  Noun2;
dominicana  Noun2;
ecóloga  Noun2;
égloga  Noun2;
elisenda  Noun2;
empanada  Noun2;
enigma  Noun2;
epifanía  Noun2;
escandinava  Noun2;
escultora  Noun2;
espuma  Noun2;
estima  Noun2;
eulalia  Noun2;
expoventa  Noun2;
falangista  Noun2;
favia  Noun2;
filarmonía  Noun2;
flaminia  Noun2;
formulista  Noun2;
fregona  Noun2;
fusta  Noun2;
gana  Noun2;
gavilla  Noun2;
germanista  Noun2;
glotona  Noun2;
grafía  Noun2;
grima  Noun2;
guarrada  Noun2;
habla  Noun2;
hechura  Noun2;
hermana  Noun2;
hilandera  Noun2;
holandesa  Noun2;
hortaliza  Noun2;
iberoamericana  Noun2;
imperialista  Noun2;
indigencia  Noun2;
inspectora  Noun2;
irlandesa  Noun2;
jaca  Noun2;
jimena  Noun2;
jurista  Noun2;
laila  Noun2;
laureana  Noun2;
lempira  Noun2;
levadura  Noun2;
lidia  Noun2;
lisonja  Noun2;
loyola  Noun2;
llanca  Noun2;
magistratura  Noun2;
malla  Noun2;
manuela  Noun2;
maricastaña  Noun2;
matadora  Noun2;
médica  Noun2;
mendiga  Noun2;
metalúrgica  Noun2;
mímica  Noun2;
mitra  Noun2;
monotonía  Noun2;
motocicleta  Noun2;
musulmana  Noun2;
nayla  Noun2;
niebla  Noun2;
nota  Noun2;
obediencia  Noun2;
órbita  Noun2;
paliza  Noun2;
parranda  Noun2;
peineta  Noun2;
persiana  Noun2;
piraña  Noun2;
polígrafa  Noun2;
presentadora  Noun2;
protesta  Noun2;
quiebra  Noun2;
ratonera  Noun2;
repatriada  Noun2;
rodaja  Noun2;
sala  Noun2;
seminarista  Noun2;
siquiatra  Noun2;
subordinada  Noun2;
taquígrafa  Noun2;
teodolinda  Noun2;
toca  Noun2;
trata  Noun2;
ucraniana  Noun2;
vanina  Noun2;
veta  Noun2;
vitualla  Noun2;
zaira  Noun2;
abominación  Noun3;
abstracción  Noun3;
aceptación  Noun3;
actuación  Noun3;
adaptación  Noun3;
admiración  Noun3;
adquisición  Noun3;
afición  Noun3;
agitación  Noun3;
aleación  Noun3;
alocución  Noun3;
amortiguación  Noun3;
anotación  Noun3;
apelación  Noun3;
apreciación  Noun3;
argumentación  Noun3;
asociación  Noun3;
atracción  Noun3;
autofinanciación  Noun3;
aviación  Noun3;
calcinación  Noun3;
canción  Noun3;
capitulación  Noun3;
celebración  Noun3;
circunspección  Noun3;
claudicación  Noun3;
codificación  Noun3;
colación  Noun3;
coloración  Noun3;
compenetración  Noun3;
composición  Noun3;
concentración  Noun3;
concreción  Noun3;
condición  Noun3;
confederación  Noun3;
conflagración  Noun3;
conjugación  Noun3;
conmoción  Noun3;
conservación  Noun3;
constatación  Noun3;
construcción  Noun3;
contemplación  Noun3;
contracción  Noun3;
contravención  Noun3;
convicción  Noun3;
coproducción  Noun3;
correlación  Noun3;
cremación  Noun3;
declamación  Noun3;
dedicación  Noun3;
definición  Noun3;
delación  Noun3;
denominación  Noun3;
depravación  Noun3;
descalificación  Noun3;
deserción  Noun3;
desintegración  Noun3;
desorientación  Noun3;
destrucción  Noun3;
determinación  Noun3;
devolución  Noun3;
diputación  Noun3;
dislocación  Noun3;
distinción  Noun3;
documentación  Noun3;
duración  Noun3;
edificación  Noun3;
elección  Noun3;
emancipación  Noun3;
emulación  Noun3;
entonación  Noun3;
erección  Noun3;
estación  Noun3;
evacuación  Noun3;
exaltación  Noun3;
exención  Noun3;
expectoración  Noun3;
exploración  Noun3;
extinción  Noun3;
fabricación  Noun3;
fecundación  Noun3;
ficción  Noun3;
forestación  Noun3;
fracción  Noun3;
función  Noun3;
generalización  Noun3;
gracián  Noun3;
gravitación  Noun3;
humillación  Noun3;
imaginación  Noun3;
imposición  Noun3;
incrustación  Noun3;
indiscreción  Noun3;
inflación  Noun3;
innovación  Noun3;
insolación  Noun3;
instigación  Noun3;
insurrección  Noun3;
interdicción  Noun3;
interpretación  Noun3;
intoxicación  Noun3;
invención  Noun3;
inyección  Noun3;
irrupción  Noun3;
lección  Noun3;
liberación  Noun3;
loción  Noun3;
lubrificación  Noun3;
manifestación  Noun3;
mediación  Noun3;
migración  Noun3;
modificación  Noun3;
murmuración  Noun3;
narración  Noun3;
negación  Noun3;
notificación  Noun3;
objeción  Noun3;
obstrucción  Noun3;
opción  Noun3;
ordenación  Noun3;
ostentación  Noun3;
panificación  Noun3;
percepción  Noun3;
permutación  Noun3;
pigmentación  Noun3;
porción  Noun3;
predicción  Noun3;
preparación  Noun3;
prestación  Noun3;
prevención  Noun3;
programación  Noun3;
promoción  Noun3;
prosecución  Noun3;
provocación  Noun3;
punición  Noun3;
ración  Noun3;
recepción  Noun3;
recopilación  Noun3;
regulación  Noun3;
reparación  Noun3;
resolución  Noun3;
reverberación  Noun3;
sección  Noun3;
sobreproducción  Noun3;
sujeción  Noun3;
sustracción  Noun3;
traducción  Noun3;
transposición  Noun3;
usurpación  Noun3;
vibración  Noun3;
